Utah statutes.
17D-2-104.   Local building authority property exempt from taxation.

Property owned, held, or acquired by a local building authority, including all rent or other payment due under a lease agreement, is exempt from all taxation in the state.



Enacted by Chapter 360, 2008 General Session

